District of Columbia statutes.
1-612.07

Application for withdrawal.

An application for withdrawal shall proceed as follows:

(1)

An employee who has been affected by a medical emergency may make written application to the employee’s personnel authority to become a leave recipient;

(2)

If the employee is not capable of making application on the employee’s own behalf, another employee of the personnel authority may make written application on the employee’s behalf; and

(3)

The application shall be notarized by the affected employee or the employee acting on the affected employee’s behalf.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1207
as added Sept. 11, 1990, D.C. Law 8-155, § 2, 37 DCR 4159

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-612.05.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-613.7.